Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.900

Construction—Supplemental nature of chapter.

This chapter supplements and neither restricts nor limits any powers which a municipality or presently authorized public corporation might otherwise have under any laws of this state.

[ 1981 c 300 s 17.]